dicts/dsb/dsb.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aoenjwsirktupśmydlózcěbłgšžźhćWńfTŕNJPSZMKCDBGAŹRHLčŠŽFEŁOŚIvUxöVqüČéQXĆäÜá
NOSUGGEST !
SFX a Y 17
SFX a 0 a [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 oju [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 om [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 u [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 owu [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 oma [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 y tš
SFX a 0 y gólc
SFX a jas sy pjas
SFX a 0 y wóśc
SFX a 0 e [^cšsaeěiouy]
SFX a 0 e [^lś]c
SFX a 0 e [^a]s
SFX a 0 ow [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 am [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 ami [^aeěiouy]
SFX a 0 ach [^aeěiouy]
SFX b Y 9
SFX b a e a
SFX b a i a
SFX b a u a
SFX b a owu a
SFX b a oma a
SFX b a ow a
SFX b 0 m a
SFX b 0 mi a
SFX b 0 ch a
SFX c Y 9
SFX c a e a
SFX c a y a
SFX c a u a
SFX c a owu a
SFX c a oma a
SFX c a ow a
SFX c 0 m a
SFX c 0 mi a
SFX c 0 ch a
SFX d Y 12
SFX d o a o
SFX d 0 ju o
SFX d o u no
SFX d 0 m o
SFX d o je o
SFX d o i eno
SFX d 0 wu o
SFX d 0 ma o
SFX d 0 w o
SFX d o am o
SFX d o ami o
SFX d o ach o
SFX e Y 14
SFX e a y a
SFX e zda zdźe zda
SFX e da źe [^z]da
SFX e cha še cha
SFX e ła le ła
SFX e sta sće sta
SFX e ta śe [^s]ta
SFX e a u a
SFX e a owu a
SFX e a oma a
SFX e a ow a
SFX e a am a
SFX e a ami a
SFX e a ach a
SFX f Y 33
SFX f ś ju ś
SFX f ś ju/G ś
SFX f ś jom ś
SFX f ś jom/G ś
SFX f ś još ś
SFX f ś još/G ś
SFX f ś jo ś
SFX f ś jo/G ś
SFX f ś jomej ś
SFX f ś jomej/G ś
SFX f ś jotej ś
SFX f ś jotej/G ś
SFX f ś jomy ś
SFX f ś jomy/G ś
SFX f ś jośo ś
SFX f ś jośo/G ś
SFX f ś j ś
SFX f ś j/G ś
SFX f ś jtej ś
SFX f ś jtej/G ś
SFX f ś jśo ś
SFX f ś jśo/G ś
SFX f ś ł ś
SFX f ś ła ś
SFX f ś ło ś
SFX f ś łej ś
SFX f ś li ś
SFX f ś ch ś
SFX f ś chmy ś
SFX f ś 0 ś
SFX f ś ny/w ś
SFX f ś nje/p ś
SFX f ś t ś
SFX g Y 16
SFX g o a o
SFX g 0 ju o
SFX g o u o
SFX g 0 m o
SFX g o y [csšzž]o
SFX g jo i [bnrw]jo
SFX g o i [^bnrw]jo
SFX g o i [ćl]o
SFX g ko ce ko
SFX g cho še cho
SFX g 0 wu o
SFX g 0 ma o
SFX g 0 w o
SFX g o am o
SFX g o ami o
SFX g o ach o
SFX h Y 29
SFX h ś jom ś
SFX h ś jom/G ś
SFX h ś još ś
SFX h ś još/G ś
SFX h ś jo ś
SFX h ś jo/G ś
SFX h ś jomej ś
SFX h ś jomej/G ś
SFX h ś jotej ś
SFX h ś jotej/G ś
SFX h ś jomy ś
SFX h ś jomy/G ś
SFX h ś jośo ś
SFX h ś jośo/G ś
SFX h ś ju ś
SFX h ś ju/G ś
SFX h ś j ś
SFX h ś j/G ś
SFX h ś jtej ś
SFX h ś jtej/G ś
SFX h ś jśo ś
SFX h ś jśo/G ś
SFX h ś ł ś
SFX h ś ła ś
SFX h ś ło ś
SFX h ś łej ś
SFX h ś li ś
SFX h ś ty/w ś
SFX h ś t ś
SFX i Y 26
SFX i aś m jaś
SFX i aś m/G jaś
SFX i aś š jaś
SFX i aś š/G jaś
SFX i aś 0 jaś
SFX i aś 0/G jaś
SFX i aś mej jaś
SFX i aś mej/G jaś
SFX i aś tej jaś
SFX i aś tej/G jaś
SFX i aś my jaś
SFX i aś my/G jaś
SFX i aś śo jaś
SFX i aś śo/G jaś
SFX i aś e jaś
SFX i aś e/G jaś
SFX i ś ł jaś
SFX i ś ła jaś
SFX i ś ło jaś
SFX i ś łej jaś
SFX i ś li jaś
SFX i ś ch jaś
SFX i ś chmy jaś
SFX i aś ecy/w jaś
SFX i ś nje/p jaś
SFX i ś t jaś
SFX j Y 49
SFX j ś m iś
SFX j ś m/G iś
SFX j ś š iś
SFX j ś š/G iś
SFX j ś 0 iś
SFX j ś 0/G iś
SFX j ś mej iś
SFX j ś mej/G iś
SFX j ś tej iś
SFX j ś tej/G iś
SFX j ś my iś
SFX j ś my/G iś
SFX j ś śo iś
SFX j ś śo/G iś
SFX j iś je iś
SFX j iś je/G iś
SFX j ś 0 [cdglłstž][ln]iś
SFX j ś 0/G [cdglłstž][ln]iś
SFX j iś 0 [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX j iś 0/G [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX j niś ń [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX j niś ń/G [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX j riś ŕ riś
SFX j riś ŕ/G riś
SFX j ś tej [cdglłstž][ln]iś
SFX j ś tej/G [cdglłstž][ln]iś
SFX j iś tej [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX j iś tej/G [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX j niś ńtej [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX j niś ńtej/G [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX j riś ŕtej riś
SFX j riś ŕtej/G riś
SFX j ś śo [cdglłstž][ln]iś
SFX j ś śo/G [cdglłstž][ln]iś
SFX j iś śo [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX j iś śo/G [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX j niś ńśo [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX j niś ńśo/G [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX j riś ŕśo riś
SFX j riś ŕśo/G riś
SFX j ś ł iś
SFX j ś ła iś
SFX j ś ło iś
SFX j ś łej iś
SFX j ś li iś
SFX j iś jecy/w iś
SFX j iś jony/w iś
SFX j iś jenje/p iś
SFX j ś t iś
SFX k Y 18
SFX k a e ja
SFX k ej je wej
SFX k ja i ja
SFX k ej i wej
SFX k a u ja
SFX k ej ju wej
SFX k a owu ja
SFX k ej jowu wej
SFX k a oma ja
SFX k ej joma wej
SFX k a ow ja
SFX k ej jow wej
SFX k 0 m ja
SFX k ej jam wej
SFX k 0 mi ja
SFX k ej jami wej
SFX k 0 ch ja
SFX k ej jach wej
SFX l Y 30
SFX l ŕ rja ŕ
SFX l ń nja ń
SFX l 0 ja [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rjom ŕ
SFX l ń njom ń
SFX l 0 jom [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rju ŕ
SFX l ń nju ń
SFX l 0 ju [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rjowu ŕ
SFX l ń njowu ń
SFX l 0 jowu [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rjoma ŕ
SFX l ń njoma ń
SFX l 0 joma [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rje ŕ
SFX l ń nje ń
SFX l 0 je [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rjow ŕ
SFX l ń njow ń
SFX l 0 jow [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rjam ŕ
SFX l ń njam ń
SFX l 0 jam [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rjami ŕ
SFX l ń njami ń
SFX l 0 jami [bpw]
SFX l ŕ rjach ŕ
SFX l ń njach ń
SFX l 0 jach [bpw]
SFX m Y 37
SFX m ś ju ś
SFX m ś ju/G ś
SFX m ś jom ś
SFX m ś jom/G ś
SFX m ś još ś
SFX m ś još/G ś
SFX m ś jo ś
SFX m ś jo/G ś
SFX m ś jomej ś
SFX m ś jomej/G ś
SFX m ś jotej ś
SFX m ś jotej/G ś
SFX m ś jomy ś
SFX m ś jomy/G ś
SFX m ś jośo ś
SFX m ś jośo/G ś
SFX m ś 0 [cdglłstž][lnr]iś
SFX m ś 0/G [cdglłstž][lnr]iś
SFX m iś 0 [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX m iś 0/G [^cdglłstž][^nr]iś
SFX m riś ŕ [^cdglłstž]riś
SFX m riś ŕ/G [^cdglłstž]riś
SFX m niś ń [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX m niś ń/G [^cdglłstž]niś
SFX m ś ł ś
SFX m ś ła ś
SFX m ś ło ś
SFX m ś łej ś
SFX m ś li ś
SFX m ś ch ś
SFX m ś chmy ś
SFX m ś 0 iś
SFX m iś jony/w [fnprw]iś
SFX m iś ony/w [ćjlśź]iś
SFX m iś jenje/p [fnprw]iś
SFX m iś enje/p [ćjlśź]iś
SFX m ś t ś
SFX n Y 34
SFX n ś m ś
SFX n ś m/G ś
SFX n ś š ś
SFX n ś š/G ś
SFX n ś 0 ś
SFX n ś 0/G ś
SFX n ś mej ś
SFX n ś mej/G ś
SFX n ś tej ś
SFX n ś tej/G ś
SFX n ś my ś
SFX n ś my/G ś
SFX n ś śo ś
SFX n ś śo/G ś
SFX n ś ju ś
SFX n ś ju/G ś
SFX n ś j ś
SFX n ś j/G ś
SFX n ś jtej ś
SFX n ś jtej/G ś
SFX n ś jśo ś
SFX n ś jśo/G ś
SFX n ś ł ś
SFX n ś ła ś
SFX n ś ło ś
SFX n ś łej ś
SFX n ś li ś
SFX n ś ch ś
SFX n ś chmy ś
SFX n ś šo ś
SFX n ś jucy/w ś
SFX n ś ny/w ś
SFX n ś nje/p ś
SFX n ś t ś
SFX o Y 20
SFX o 0 i [jlśź]
SFX o 0 i sć
SFX o 0 u [jlśź]
SFX o 0 u sć
SFX o 0 owu [jlśź]
SFX o 0 owu sć
SFX o 0 oma [jlśź]
SFX o 0 oma sć
SFX o 0 ow [jlśź]
SFX o 0 ow sć
SFX o i ow sći
SFX o 0 am [jlśź]
SFX o 0 am sć
SFX o i am sći
SFX o 0 ami [jlśź]
SFX o 0 ami sć
SFX o i ami sći
SFX o 0 ach [jlśź]
SFX o 0 ach sć
SFX o i ach sći
SFX p Y 11
SFX p e a nje
SFX p 0 ju nje
SFX p je im nje
SFX p e u nje
SFX p je i nje
SFX p e owu nje
SFX p e oma nje
SFX p e ow nje
SFX p e am nje
SFX p e ami nje
SFX p e ach nje
SFX q Y 9
SFX q a y a
SFX q a je a
SFX q a u a
SFX q a owu a
SFX q a oma a
SFX q a ow a
SFX q a am a
SFX q a ami a
SFX q a ach a
SFX r Y 33
SFX r owaś uju owaś
SFX r owaś uju/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujom owaś
SFX r owaś ujom/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujoš owaś
SFX r owaś ujoš/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujo owaś
SFX r owaś ujo/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujomej owaś
SFX r owaś ujomej/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujotej owaś
SFX r owaś ujotej/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujomy owaś
SFX r owaś ujomy/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujośo owaś
SFX r owaś ujośo/G owaś
SFX r owaś uj owaś
SFX r owaś uj/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujtej owaś
SFX r owaś ujtej/G owaś
SFX r owaś ujśo owaś
SFX r owaś ujśo/G owaś
SFX r ś ł ś
SFX r ś ła ś
SFX r ś ło ś
SFX r ś łej ś
SFX r ś li ś
SFX r ś ch ś
SFX r ś chmy ś
SFX r owaś ujucy/w owaś
SFX r ś ny/w ś
SFX r ś nje/p ś
SFX r ś t ś
SFX s Y 12
SFX s 0 a [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 oju [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 om [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 u [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 owu [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 oma [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 y h
SFX s 0 i [^hcŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 ow [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 am [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 ami [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX s 0 ach [^cŕaeěiouy]
SFX t Y 11
SFX t a i [gk]a
SFX t ka ce ka
SFX t ga dze zga
SFX t ga ze [^z]ga
SFX t a u [gk]a
SFX t a owu [gk]a
SFX t a oma [gk]a
SFX t a ow [gk]a
SFX t 0 m [gk]a
SFX t 0 mi [gk]a
SFX t 0 ch [gk]a
SFX u Y 14
SFX u 0 a [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 oju [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 om [^aeěiouy]
SFX u t će st
SFX u t śe [^s]t
SFX u d źe d
SFX u ł le ł
SFX u 0 owu [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 oma [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 y [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 ow [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 am [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 ami [^aeěiouy]
SFX u 0 ach [^aeěiouy]
