dicts/dsb/dsb.dic
anomalija/b
aptryt/u
bacchantka/t
bajca/c
Bangladeš/a
barłogaŕ/l
baskišćina/q
bastaja/b
běłogardist/u
betonowišćo/g
bilda/e
blabiś/j
blidarnja/k
bomcarka/t
bonaŕ/l
boncojstwo/d
bójaś/i
bóžemko/g
brjaza/c
brjuchac/a
bruk/s
Bucyna/q
buršikoznosć/o
carniś/j
cesakaŕ/l
cesnosć/o
chłod/u
chłošćarnicka/t
chłoźarnja/k
Chołmc/a
chódota/e
chripaś/n
chwalobiś/j
colonica/c
copanje/p
cybula/b
cygańšćina/q
dalokoglědak/s
dejaś/i
desinformacija/b
diplomand/u
dirigentstwo/d
dispensěrowaś/r
diza/c
długaŕ/l
doběrka/t
dopołnosć/o
dopomogaś/n
došparaś/f
dostojaś/i
dowiźenje/p
drapalc/a
drěcownja/k
drjewisko/g
drobiś/j
dychawa/q
ekologija/b
ekskluziwita/e
Ekuadorianaŕ/l
elektromagnet/u
encyklopedistka/t
ewangelizacija/b
fachnik/s
fetiš/a
fotomontaža/c
fragilita/e
Frankobrod/u
fryšnosć/o
fyziologija/b
garbowarstwo/d
gažistka/t
gerbera/q
gipsowaŕ/l
girlic/a
gnuś/hF
góletkownja/k
górisko/g
góspodarjowaś/r
gótowanje/p
gustota/e
hieroglyfa/q
historiografija/b
hobłotk/s
hurarnistwo/d
huriś/j
husit/u
hynakšosć/o
hyža/c
informacija/b
insiderka/t
izolěrowaŕ/l
jadnorogac/a
jedła/e
jětśeńko/g
jěźarnja/k
kabat/u
kalorija/b
kamasutra/q
katalyza/c
kcomnosć/o
kjarmiś/j
klapota/e
klasnjenje/p
klekownja/k
knechtojstwo/d
knězk/s
Knorawa/q
kokaś/n
kokot/u
kombinacija/b
komers/a
kompromislarka/t
konditarnja/k
konterrewolucionaŕ/l
kontrolěrowaś/r
korelacija/b
korne/u
kósyłko/g
kšasniś/j
kśica/c
kumoda/e
kuparnja/k
kuporina/q
kuš/a
KZ/u
lasnosć/o
lěgwo/d
lětnik/s
lětniś/j
licencěrowanje/p
limit/u
listarka/t
liwreja/b
logikaŕ/l
lymfa/q
łoboda/e
łopjenka/g
maśerstwo/d
melasa/c
měškarnja/k
mikrostruktura/q
miłosć/o
minus/a
misija/b
moda/e
monarchist/u
módriś/j
mrocyk/s
mrokawka/t
mudrostaŕ/l
nabójaś/i
najśpa/q
nakładownja/k
nakłaźenje/p
nakopiś/m
nakusaś/f
naměś/h
nanojstwo/d
napowaś/n
napódobnjowaś/r
nariś/j
nasnědaś/f
njeeficientnosć/o
njewótšosć/o
njewóźak/s
nocnica/c
nozysko/g
nuzkanje/p
olympiada/e
paks/a
paśpula/b
pěskownja/k
pianistka/t
pigment/u
pijaństwo/d
pinowaŕ/l
pjelsniś/j
pjelucha/e
płakarnica/c
pławnik/s
pokutarnja/k
potwjelryba/q
powdaś/f
powědańko/g
póchójźiś/m
pódbijaś/n
póddanosć/o
pódegnuś/hF
pódpłatanje/p
pódpósłuchowaś/r
pódstojaś/i
pónajmaś/f
pósejźarnja/k
póstojaś/i
póstrowiś/m
pósypowańc/a
pówobjadnaś/f
pówomyś/h
prabuch/s
prakśesćijaństwo/d
promjeniś/j
prostata/e
proza/c
pśebijaś/n
pśedgronaŕ/l
pśegłosowaś/r
pśekopiś/m
pśekupcowka/t
pśekwakaś/f
pśeniženje/p
pśepiś/h
pśesadnišćo/g
pśesukaś/f
pśewlekaś/n
pśewopacniś/m
pśewześ/h
pśigótowaś/r
pśikazowarstwo/d
pśimak/s
pśipłataś/f
pśirodnosć/o
pśistojaś/i
pśiwuznaś/h
pśizapłaśiś/m
pśizdrjawaś/n
pśizjawjarnja/k
pult/u
pyšniś/j
Radyńc/a
rěcywěda/e
redakcija/b
rektificěrowanje/p
relewanca/c
rjemjeń/l
rosćina/q
rošěrowaś/r
rozkazanišćo/g
rozkidaś/f
rozswětlarstwo/d
roztrěś/h
roztśeńtliś/m
rozwijaś/n
rubjažnik/s
rucnikariś/j
Samowka/t
samsewobšuda/e
sebjewědobnosć/o
serbstwo/d
šismatikaŕ/l
skalkowanje/p
Skjarbošc/a
šklica/c
składownja/k
skoliděrowaś/r
škrabałko/g
skusaś/f
skuźerak/s
šlachta/e
sławiś/j
słod/u
słozyna/q
sopranistka/t
špindla/b
sprěwaś/n
stalotwarstwo/d
stawack/s
stojaś/i
stretš/a
stśělica/c
stśepliś/m
stupkaŕ/l
šuflitowanišćo/g
swětłosć/o
swinje/k
šyfrěrowanje/p
šyś/h
śěriś/j
takotaś/r
tamlět/u
tangenta/e
termika/t
tona/q
topołk/s
transportnistwo/d
trasa/c
tšawišća/g
tyfus/a
wentilacija/b
wěriś/j
wěšćaŕ/l
wjedrarnja/k
wjelicaś/n
wobedaś/f
wobgranicowanosć/o
wobiś/h
wobpowjesk/s
wobstojaś/i
wobstśigaś/f
wobswětliś/m
wobwjertowaś/r
wobydlarstwo/d
wobzukowanje/p
wokeńco/g
woměwaś/n
wódrěś/h
wólška/t
Wórlica/c
wósromośiś/m
wótcytaś/f
wótmyś/h
wótpłunjaś/n
wótrejtowaś/r
wótštapiś/m
wótstojaś/i
wótwariś/h
wótźělenje/p
wubójaś/i
wuchac/a
wuchawa/q
wudalniś/m
wudrogowaŕ/l
wugbaś/fn
wuglědko/g
wugluraś/f
wujkojstwo/d
wukleplowaś/r
wuměś/h
wuprozniś/m
wusedarnja/k
wušparaś/f
wustojaś/i
wustylowaś/r
wutraś/h
wuwětšenje/p
wuwóstajiś/m
wuwrośaś/n
zagłowk/s
zagórjonosć/o
zagroda/e
zaklaskaś/f
zaklěś/h
zakokuliś/m
zamoderěrowaś/r
zapłunjaś/n
zastojaś/i
zašulowanje/p
zaswěśiś/m
zawód/u
zažarbowaŕ/l
zažyś/h
zelezo/g
zemjanka/t
zeprěwaś/n
zeskazowaś/r
zeskowaś/f
zezdrjaliś/m
zežněś/h
złosnica/c
złostnistwo/d
zubiś/j
zwěriś/m
zwobrězowaś/r
źaržańko/g
źěkowanje/p
źěłabnosć/o
źiśelc/a
